Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-548
Bond; action on in name of state; when.

If such a judgment, rendered against the principal on such bond, shall not be satisfied within sixty days after it has become final, the judgment creditor may, for his own use and benefit and at his sole expense, bring an action or actions in the name of the state against the company or persons executing such bond, including an action in equity to foreclose any lien that may exist upon the real estate of a person who has executed such bond.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 48, p. 499.